Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 5 Spendthrift Provisions and Creditors’ Rights and Claims

53-12-80.
Spendthrift provisions.

A spendthrift provision shall only be valid if it prohibits both voluntary and involuntary transfers.

A term of a trust providing that the interest of a beneficiary is held subject to a spendthrift trust, or words of similar import, shall be sufficient to restrain both voluntary and involuntary transfer of the beneficiary’s interest in the manner set forth in this article.

A beneficiary shall not transfer an interest in a trust in violation of a valid spendthrift provision, and, except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary shall not reach the interest or a distribution by the trustee before its receipt by the beneficiary.

A spendthrift provision shall not be valid as to the following claims against a beneficiary’s right to a current distribution to the extent the distribution would be subject to garnishment under Article 1 of Chapter 4 of Title 18 if the distribution were disposable earnings:

Alimony or child support;

Taxes or other governmental claims;

Tort judgments;

Judgments or orders for restitution as a result of a criminal conviction of the beneficiary; or

Judgments for necessaries.

The ability of a creditor or assignee to reach a beneficiary’s interest under this subsection shall not apply to the extent that it would disqualify the trust as a special needs trust established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sections 1396p(d)(4)(A) or 1396p(d)(4)(C).

A provision in a trust instrument that a beneficiary’s interest shall terminate or become discretionary upon an attempt by the beneficiary to transfer it, an attempt by the beneficiary’s creditors to reach it, or upon the bankruptcy or receivership of the beneficiary shall be valid except to the extent of the proportion of trust property attributable to such beneficiary’s contribution.

If a beneficiary is also a contributor to the trust, a spendthrift provision shall not be valid as to such beneficiary to the extent of the proportion of trust property attributable to such beneficiary’s contribution. This subsection shall not apply to a special needs trust established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sections 1396p(d)(4)(A) or 1396p(d)(4)(C).

Notwithstanding any other provision in this Code section, a spendthrift provision in a pension or retirement arrangement described in sections 401, 403, 404, 408, 408A, 409, 414, or 457 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be valid with reference to the entire interest of the beneficiary in the income, principal, or both, even if the beneficiary is also a contributor of trust property, except where a claim is made pursuant to a qualified domestic relations order as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 414(p).

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142; Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 4/SB 255.

Law reviews.

For article, “Self-Settled Asset Protection Trusts in Georgia,” see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 17 (Feb. 2018).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-81.
Limitations on creditors’ rights to discretionary distributions.

A transferee or creditor of a beneficiary shall not compel the trustee or a trust director to pay any amount that is payable only in the discretion of the trustee or trust director regardless of whether the discretion is expressed in the form of a standard of distribution, including, but not limited to, health, education, maintenance, and support, and whether such trustee or trust director is also a beneficiary. This Code section shall not apply to the extent of the proportion of trust property attributable to the beneficiary’s contribution.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 12/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-78/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the first sentence of this Code section, inserted “or a trust director” following “compel the trustee”, substituted “discretion of the trustee or trust director” for “trustee’s discretion”, and inserted “or trust director” following “such trustee”.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-82.
Rules for trusts; consideration of assets of an inter vivos marital trust following death.

As used in this subsection, the term “creditor” means:

With respect to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, those creditors of a settlor whose claims against the property of the trust are governed by this article, including those creditors identified in subsection (d) of Code Section 53-12-80; and

With respect to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, those claimants whose claims against the property of the settlor’s estate are governed by Article 4 of Chapter 7 of this title, including those claimants identified in Code Section 53-7-40.

Regardless of whether the trust instrument contains a spendthrift provision, the following rules shall apply:

During the lifetime of the settlor, the property of a revocable trust shall be subject to claims of the settlor’s creditors;

With respect to an irrevocable trust:

Creditors or assignees of the settlor may reach the maximum amount that can be distributed to or for the settlor’s benefit during the settlor’s life or that could have been distributed to or for the settlor’s benefit immediately prior to the settlor’s death, provided that, if a trust has more than one settlor, the amount the creditors or assignees of a particular settlor may reach shall not exceed the settlor’s interest in the portion of the trust attributable to that settlor’s contribution; and

The portion of a trust that can be distributed to or for the settlor’s benefit pursuant to the power of a trustee, whether arising under the trust instrument or any other law, to make a distribution to or for the benefit of a settlor for the purpose of reimbursing the settlor in an amount equal to any income taxes payable on any portion of the trust principal and income that is treated as the settlor’s individual income under applicable law shall not be considered an amount that can be distributed to or for the settlor’s benefit during the settlor’s life or that could have been distributed to or for the settlor’s benefit immediately prior to the settlor’s death; and

After the death of a settlor, and subject to the settlor’s right to direct the source from which liabilities shall be paid:

The property of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death or had become irrevocable as a result of the settlor’s incapacity shall be subject to claims of the creditors of the settlor’s estate to the extent the settlor’s probate estate is inadequate; and

Payments that would not be subject to the claims of the creditors of the settlor’s estate if made by way of beneficiary designation to persons other than the settlor’s estate shall not be made subject to such claims by virtue of this Code section unless otherwise provided in the trust instrument.

Another trust to the extent such trust’s assets are attributable to a trust described in division (i) or (ii) of this subparagraph.

As used in this subsection, the term:

Subject to Article 4 of Chapter 2 of Title 18, after the death of the settlor’s spouse, the assets of an inter vivos marital trust shall be deemed to have been contributed by the settlor’s spouse and not by the settlor.

(A)

“Inter vivos marital trust” means:

(i)

A trust described in Section 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on February 1, 2018;

(ii)

A trust for which the election described in Section 2523(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on February 1, 2018, has been made; or

(B)

“Settlor’s spouse” means the spouse of the settlor at the time of the creation of an inter vivos marital trust, regardless of whether such spouse is married to the settlor at the time of such spouse’s death.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 13/HB 121; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 53/SB 52; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-79/HB 865.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subparagraph (a)(2)(A).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted paragraph (a)(1) and designated the former existing provisions of subsection (a) as current paragraph (a)(2); in paragraph (a)(2), substituted “”Regardless of whether“ for ”Whether or not“ in the introductory language, redesignated former paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2) and (a)(3) as subparagraphs (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(B) and (a)(2)(C), redesignated former subparagraphs (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B) as divisions (a)(2)(A)(i) and (a)(2)(A)(ii); substituted ”instrument“ for ”“agreement” in division (a)(2)(A)(ii); in subparagraph (a)(2)(C), substituted “: (i) The” for “, the”, substituted “creditors of the settlor’s estate to the extent the settlor’s” for “settlor’s creditors to the extent the”, substituted “; and (ii)” for a period, and substituted “creditors of the settlor’s estate” for “settlor’s creditors”.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2014).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-83.
Creditors’ claims against property that is subject to withdrawal right.

The holder of a power of withdrawal, during the period that the power may be exercised, shall be treated in the same manner as the settlor of a revocable trust to the extent of the property subject to the power. The lapse, release, or waiver of a power of withdrawal shall not cause the holder to be treated as a settlor of the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.